src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
!
LEXICON k_flt26
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for pl
 +N+Msc:^IUML S_M_PLNOM_IR ;
 +N+Msc:^IUML S_M_PLACC_IR ;
 +N+Msc:       S_M_PLDAT    ;
 +N+Msc:       S_M_PLGEN    ;
!
LEXICON k27 !
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for  vøkstur
 +N+Msc:           S_M_SGNOM_NULL ;
 +N+Msc:           S_M_SGACC      ;
 +N+Msc:^EPH      S_M_SGDAT      ;
 +N+Msc:^EPH^OEA S_M_SGGEN_AR   ;
 +N+Msc:^EPH      S_M_PLNOM_IR   ;
 +N+Msc:^EPH      S_M_PLACC_IR   ;
 +N+Msc:^EPH      S_M_PLDAT      ;
 +N+Msc:^EPH^OEA S_M_PLGEN      ;
!
LEXICON k28 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for  dráttur
  k28e    ;
  k_flt28 ;
!
LEXICON k28e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for sg
 +N+Msc:    S_M_SGNOM ;
 +N+Msc:ur     S_M_SGACC      ;
 +N+Msc:r S_M_SGDAT ;
 +N+Msc:r S_M_SGGEN_AR   ;
!
LEXICON k_flt28
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for pl
 +N+Msc:r S_M_PLNOM_IR ;
 +N+Msc:r S_M_PLACC_IR ;
 +N+Msc:r S_M_PLDAT    ;
 +N+Msc:r S_M_PLGEN    ;
!
LEXICON k29 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for  tráður
 +N+Msc:          S_M_SGNOM      ;
 +N+Msc:          S_M_SGACC      ;
 +N+Msc:          S_M_SGDAT      ;
 +N+Msc:          S_M_SGDAT_NULL ;
 +N+Msc:^IUMLr   S_M_SGDAT      ;
 +N+Msc:          S_M_SGGEN_AR   ;
 +N+Msc:^IUML%>r S_M_PLNOM_IR   ;
 +N+Msc:^IUML%>r S_M_PLACC_IR   ;
 +N+Msc:          S_M_PLDAT      ;
 +N+Msc:^IUML%>r S_M_PLDAT      ;
 +N+Msc:          S_M_PLGEN      ;
!
LEXICON k30 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for  fótur
  k30e    ;
  k_flt30 ;
!
LEXICON k30e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for sg
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGNOM    ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGACC    ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGDAT    ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGGEN_AR ;
!
LEXICON k_flt30
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for pl
 +N+Msc:^IUML S_M_PLNOM_UR ;
 +N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def:^IUML%>rinar MscObl_Flag ; ! føtrinar
 +N+Msc:^IUML S_M_PLACC_UR ;
 +N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def:^IUML%>rinar MscObl_Flag ;
 +N+Msc:       S_M_PLDAT    ;
 +N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def:^IUML%>runum MscObl_Flag ;
 +N+Msc:       S_M_PLGEN    ;
!
LEXICON k31 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for  veggur
  k31e    ;
  k_flt31 ;
!
LEXICON k31e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for sg
 +N+Msc:  S_M_SGNOM    ;
 +N+Msc:  S_M_SGACC    ;
 +N+Msc:  S_M_SGDAT    ;
 +N+Msc:j S_M_SGGEN_AR ;
!
LEXICON k_flt31
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for pl
 +N+Msc:  S_M_PLNOM_IR ;
 +N+Msc:  S_M_PLACC_IR ;
 +N+Msc:j S_M_PLDAT    ;
 +N+Msc:j S_M_PLGEN    ;
!
LEXICON k32 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for  ryggur, using k31e
           k31e         ;
 +N+Msc:  S_M_SGNOM    ;
 +N+Msc:  S_M_SGACC    ;
 +N+Msc:  S_M_SGDAT    ;
 +N+Msc:j S_M_SGGEN_AR ;
 +N+Msc:  S_M_SGGEN    ;
           k_flt31      ;
 +N+Msc:  S_M_PLNOM_IR ;
 +N+Msc:  S_M_PLACC_IR ;
 +N+Msc:j S_M_PLDAT    ;
 +N+Msc:j S_M_PLGEN    ;
!
LEXICON k33 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for  hylur
 +N+Msc:    S_M_SGNOM    ;
 +N+Msc:    S_M_SGACC    ;
 +N+Msc:    S_M_SGDAT    ;
 +N+Msc:%>j S_M_SGGEN_AR ;
 +N+Msc:    S_M_SGGEN    ;
 +N+Msc:%>j S_M_PLNOM    ;
 +N+Msc:%>j S_M_PLACC    ;
 +N+Msc:%>j S_M_PLDAT    ;
 +N+Msc:%>j S_M_PLGEN    ;
!
LEXICON k34 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for  drongur
  k34e    ;
  k_flt34 ;
!
LEXICON k34e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for sg
 +N+Msc:^EIO S_M_SGNOM    ;
 +N+Msc:^EIO S_M_SGACC    ;
 +N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def:in MscObl_Flag ; ! dreingin
 +N+Msc:^EIO S_M_SGDAT    ;
 +N+Msc:      S_M_SGDAT    ;
 +N+Msc:%>j   S_M_SGGEN_AR ;
 +N+Msc:^EIO S_M_SGGEN    ;
!
LEXICON k_flt34
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for pl
 +N+Msc:    S_M_PLNOM_IR ;
 +N+Msc:    S_M_PLACC_IR ;
 +N+Msc:%>j S_M_PLDAT    ;
 +N+Msc:%>j S_M_PLGEN    ;
 +N+Msc:^EIO    S_M_PLNOM_IR ;
 +N+Msc:^EIO    S_M_PLACC_IR ;
 +N+Msc:^EIO%>j S_M_PLDAT    ;
 +N+Msc:^EIO%>j S_M_PLGEN    ;
!
LEXICON k34_2 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for  bonkur  - formar skulu gerast fyri benk* og veng* í flt.
 :%>eink k34    ;
  +N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>enkur # ;
  +N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>enkur # ;
  +N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>enkrum # ;
  +N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def:%>enkurnir # ;
  +N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def:%>enkurnar # ;
  +N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def:%>enkrunum # ;
!
LEXICON k34_3 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for  vongur  - formar skulu gerast fyri benk* og veng* í flt.
 :%>eing k34    ;
  +N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>engur # ;
  +N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>engur # ;
  +N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>engrum # ;
  +N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def:%>engurnir # ;
  +N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def:%>engurnar # ;
  +N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def:%>engrunum # ;
!
!LEXICON k35 ! bonkur (now k34)
! +N+Msc:^EIO S_M_SGNOM    ;
! +N+Msc:^EIO S_M_SGACC    ;
! +N+Msc:^EIO S_M_SGDAT    ;
! +N+Msc:      S_M_SGDAT    ;
! +N+Msc:%>j   S_M_SGGEN_AR ;
! +N+Msc:^EIO S_M_SGGEN_AR ;
! +N+Msc:      S_M_PLNOM_IR ;
! +N+Msc:      S_M_PLACC_IR ;
! +N+Msc:%>j   S_M_PLDAT    ;
! +N+Msc:%>j   S_M_PLGEN    ;
!
LEXICON k36 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for  heyggjur
 +N+Msc:       S_M_SGNOM ;
 +N+Msc:       S_M_SGACC ;
 +N+Msc:       S_M_SGDAT ;
 +N+Msc:^GDEL S_M_SGGEN ;
 +N+Msc:       S_M_PLNOM ;
 +N+Msc:       S_M_PLACC ;
 +N+Msc:       S_M_PLDAT ;
 +N+Msc:       S_M_PLGEN ;
!
LEXICON k37 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for  skógvur
  k37e    ;
  k_flt37 ;
!
LEXICON k37e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for sg
 +N+Msc:        S_M_SGNOM ;
 +N+Msc:        S_M_SGACC ;
 +N+Msc:        S_M_SGDAT_2 ;
 +N+Msc:^GVDEL S_M_SGGEN ;
!
LEXICON k_flt37
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for pl
 +N+Msc:        S_M_PLNOM  ;
 +N+Msc:        S_M_PLACC  ;
 +N+Msc:^GVDEL S_M_PLDATm ;
 +N+Msc:        S_M_PLDAT  ;
 +N+Msc:        S_M_PLGEN  ;
!
LEXICON k38e_2
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for  súgvur
 +N+Msc:       S_M_SGNOM ;
 +N+Msc:       S_M_SGACC ;
 +N+Msc:^VDEL  S_M_SGDAT ;
 +N+Msc:^VDEL  S_M_SGGEN ;
!
LEXICON k38 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for  bógvur
  k38e    ;
  k_flt38 ;
!
LEXICON k38e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for sg
 +N+Msc:       S_M_SGNOM ;
 +N+Msc:       S_M_SGACC ;
 +N+Msc:^IUML S_M_SGDAT ;
 +N+Msc:      S_M_SGDAT ;
 +N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def:^VDEL%>num MscObl_Flag ; ! bógnum
 +N+Msc:^VDEL S_M_SGGEN ;
!
LEXICON k_flt38
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for pl
 +N+Msc:       S_M_PLNOM    ;
 +N+Msc:^IUML S_M_PLNOM_IR ;
 +N+Msc:       S_M_PLACC    ;
 +N+Msc:^IUML S_M_PLACC_IR ;
 +N+Msc:       S_M_PLDAT    ;
 +N+Msc:       S_M_PLDAT    ;
 +N+Msc:       S_M_PLGEN    ;
!
LEXICON k39 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for  sjógvur
  k39e    ;
  k_flt39 ;
!
LEXICON k39e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for sg
 +N+Msc:        S_M_SGNOM    ;
 +N+Msc:        S_M_SGACC    ;
 +N+Msc:        S_M_SGDAT_2  ;
 +N+Msc:^GDEL  S_M_SGGEN_AR ;
 +N+Msc:^GVDEL S_M_SGGEN    ;
!
LEXICON k_flt39
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for pl
 +N+Msc: S_M_PLNOM ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_PLACC ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_PLDAT ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_PLDAT ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_PLGEN ;
 !
LEXICON k40e_2
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for  hógvur2
 +N+Msc:       S_M_SGNOM ;
 +N+Msc:       S_M_SGACC ;
 +N+Msc:       S_M_SGDAT ; ! hógvinum
 +N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def:^GVDEL%>num MscObl_Flag ; ! hónum
 +N+Msc:^GVDEL S_M_SGGEN ; ! hós!
LEXICON k40_3
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for  skúgvur
 +N+Msc:       S_M_SGNOM ;
 +N+Msc:       S_M_SGACC ;
 +N+Msc:       S_M_SGDAT ;
 +N+Msc:^GDEL  S_M_SGGEN ;
  k_flt40 ;
!
LEXICON k40 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for  hógvur
  k40e    ;
  k_flt40 ;
!
LEXICON k40e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for sg
 +N+Msc:       S_M_SGNOM ;
 +N+Msc:       S_M_SGACC ;
 +N+Msc:       S_M_SGDAT ; ! hógvinum
 +N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def:^GVDEL%>num MscObl_Flag ; ! hónum
 +N+Msc:^GDEL S_M_SGGEN ; ! hóvs!
LEXICON k_flt40
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for pl
 +N+Msc: S_M_PLNOM ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_PLACC ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_PLDAT ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_PLGEN ;
!
LEXICON k41 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for  maður
  k41e    ;
  k_flt41 ;
!
LEXICON k41e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for sg
 +N+Msc+Sg+Nom:maður   DF_N_SGm ;
              :mann    k41_obl  ;
 +N+Msc+Pl+Dat:monn%>u DF_D_PL  ;
!
LEXICON k41_obl
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for oblique, hmm, needed?
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGACC ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGDAT ;
 +N+Msc: S_M_SGGEN ;
!
LEXICON k_flt41
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for pl
 +N+Msc:menn S_M_PLNOM_NULL ;
 +N+Msc:menn S_M_PLACC_NULL ;
 +N+Msc:mann S_M_PLGEN      ;
!
LEXICON k42 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for  dagur
  k42e    ;
  k_flt42 ;
