src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON Shortnouns
byrur+CmpNP/None:byr k31e ;
LEXICON Nouns
líggjafótur:líggja#fót k30 ;
hanafótur:hana#fót k30 ;
tvørfótur:tvør#fót k30 ;
snórhógvur:snór#hógv k40 ;
hógvur:hógv k40 ;
hógvur:hógv k40e_2 ;
rossahógvur:rossa#hógv k40 ;
afturhógvur:aftur#hógv k40 ;
skúgvur:skúgv k40_3 ;
stúgvur:stúgv k40 ;
pípustúgvur:pípustúgv k40 ;
veitarleggur:veitarlegg k31 ;
smokkuleggur:smokkulegg k31 ;
skilaveggur:skilavegg k31 ;
fjósveggur:fjósvegg k31 ;
postsekkur:postsekk k31 ;
vatnsdrykkur:vatnsdrykk k31 ;
fyljaleggir:fyljalegg k_flt31 ;
staraleggir:staralegg k_flt31 ;
jarðarkonuleggir:jarðarkonulegg k_flt31 ;
líkamaður:líka# k41 ;
bátamaður:báta# k41 ;
merkingarmaður:merkingar# k41 ;
løgtingsformaður:løg#tings#for# k41 ;
kjalllámsmaður:kjall#láms# k41 ;
veitslumaður:veitslu# k41 ;
helvtarmenn:helvtar# k_flt41 ;
samrúmsmenn:sam#rúms# k_flt41 ;
hamburgararyggur:hamburgararygg k32 ;
fjallryggur:fjallrygg k32 ;
mønuryggur:mønurygg k32 ;
bekkur:bekk k32 ;
dyrgingarbekkur:dyrgingarbekk k32 ;
lærbekkur:lærbekk k32 ;
miðbekkur:miðbekk k32 ;
óterradagur:ó#terra#dag k42 ;
triðidagur:triði#dag k42 ;
ferðingardagur:ferðingar#dag k42 ;
gerandisdagur:gerandis#dag k42 ;
hósdagur:hós#dag k42 ;
ymbrudagur:ymbru#dag k42 ;
bátahylur:bátahyl k33 ;
svimjihylur:svimjihyl k33 ;
áarhylur:áarhyl k33 ;
runuhylur:runuhyl k33 ;
støðuhylur:støðuhyl k33 ;
óvitadrongur:ó#vita#dreing k34 ;
bygdardrongur:bygdar#dreing k34 ;
burðardrongur:burðar#dreing k34 ;
reiðsludrongur:reiðslu#dreing k34 ;
fiólstrongur:fiól#streing k34 ;
lomvigavongur:lomviga#v k34_3 ;
vinstravongur:vinstra#v k34_3 ;
verndarvongur:verndar#v k34_3 ;
afturvongur:aftur#v k34_3 ;
sterruvongur:sterru#v k34_3 ;
sinfalastreingir:sinfala#streing k_flt34 ;
siffanastreingir:siffana#streing k_flt34 ;
sinfanastreingir:sinfana#streing k_flt34 ;
siffansstreingir:siffans#streing k_flt34 ;
sinfansstreingir:sinfans#streing k_flt34 ;
spunabonkur:spuna#b k34_2 ;
plógbonkur:plóg#b k34_2 ;
svøvnbonkur:svøvn#b k34_2 ;
sláturbonkur:slátur#b k34_2 ;
torvbonkur:torv#b k34_2 ;
mølheyggjur:mølheyggj k36 ;
eyrheyggjur:eyrheyggj k36 ;
álvheyggjur:álvheyggj k36 ;
svínastíggjur:svínastíggj k36 ;
loynistíggjur:loynistíggj k36 ;
vøkstur:vøkstur k27 ;
uppvøkstur:uppvøkstur k27 ;
stivlaskógvur:stivlaskógv k37 ;
fjaðraskógvur:fjaðraskógv k37 ;
rágummiskógvur:rágummiskógv k37 ; ! XXX check
løriftsskógvur:løriftsskógv k37 ;
rakaroðskógvur:rakaroðskógv k37 ;
ádamsskógvar:ádamsskógv k_flt37 ;
altarsskógvar:altarsskógv k_flt37 ;
purkuskógvar:purkuskógv k_flt37 ;
sjálvdráttur:sjálv#drátt k28 ;
persónsfrádráttur:persóns#frá#drátt k28 ;
svínabógvur:svínabógv k38 ;
fastabógvur:fastabógv k38 ;
skerpibógvur:skerpibógv k38 ;
stýriborðsbógvur:stýriborðsbógv k38 ;
bakborðsbógvur:bakborðsbógv k38 ;
miðbógvur:miðbógv k38 ;
sinatráður:sinatráð k29 ;
fyritráður:fyritráð k29 ;
náltráður:náltráð k29 ;
nælingartráður:nælingartráð k29 ;
alnartráður:alnartráð k29 ;
lofttráður:lofttráð k29 ;
klivtráður:klivtráð k29 ;
brotasjógvur:brotasjógv k39 ;
skaðasjógvur:skaðasjógv k39 ;
stórsjógvur:stórsjógv k39 ;
knæsbótarleggur:knæsbótarlegg k31 ;
fongur:feing k34e ;
fiskafongur:fiskafeing k34e ;
feigdarfongur:feigdarfeing k34e ;
herfongur:herfeing k34e ;
ránsfongur:ránsfeing k34e ;
sjófongur:sjófeing k34e ;
klæðseksdrongur:klæðseksdreing k34 ;
visalavongur:visala#v k34_3 ;
mergur:merg k31e ;
rossamergur:rossamerg k31e ;
neytamergur:neytamerg k31e ;
seyðamergur:seyðamerg k31e ;
blóðmergur:blóðmerg k31e ;
hulduheyggjur:hulduheyggj k36 ;
langbonkur:lang#b k34_2 ;
stutthylur:stutthyl k33 ;
fleygabyrur:fleygabyr k31e ;
rekstur:rekst k28e ;
útrøkstur:út#røkst k28 ;
illvøkstur:ill#vøkst k28 ;
kornvøkstur:korn#vøkst k28 ;
viðarvøkstur:viðar#vøkst k28 ;
krypilsvøkstur:krypils#vøkst k28 ;
mannafótur:manna#fót k30 ;
hiplingsfótur:hiplings#fót k30 ;
brekkufótur:brekku#fót k30 ;
blaðfótur:blað#fót k30 ;
snjógvur:snjógv k37e ;
skriðusnjógvur:skriðu#snjógv k37e ;
ótrivasjógvur:ó#triva#sjógv k39 ;
rennisjógvur:renni#sjógv k39 ;
grunnsjógvur:grunn#sjógv k39 ;
lakkskógvur:lakk#skógv k37 ;
mógvur:mógv k37e ;
heyggjamógvur:heyggja#mógv k37e ;
bláramógvur:blára#mógv k37e ;
undirmógvur:undir#mógv k37e ;
geldskúgvur:geld#skúgv k40_3 ;
súgvur:súgv k38e_2 ;
rennisúgvur:renni#súgv k38e_2 ;
